District of Columbia statutes.
50-2506

Executive Director.

(a)

The Board shall appoint an Executive Director who shall be the chief administrative officer of the Authority. The Executive Director shall not be a member of the Board and shall serve at the pleasure of the Board. The Executive Director shall be a District resident throughout his or her term and failure to maintain District residency shall result in a forfeiture of the position.

(b)

In addition to any other duties set forth in this chapter, the Executive Director shall:

(1)

Supervise and manage all business affairs and operation and management of properties of the Authority;

(2)

Sign and execute all authorized bonds, contracts, and other obligations in the name of the Authority;

(3)

Perform all administrative duties as may be required by the Authority; and

(4)

Perform all other duties as the Authority may require to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-153, § 7, 41 DCR 4652
Feb. 6, 2008, D.C. Law 17-108, § 216(a), 54 DCR 10993
1981 Ed., § 40-846.
D.C. Law 17-108, in subsec. (a), inserted “The Executive Director shall be a District resident throughout his or her term and failure to maintain District residency shall result in a forfeiture of the position.”